Tables/Contraction/zh_TW.ctb
always \u9592\u7a7a 15-2345-2-123-12346-5
always \u9593\u63a5 13-2345-5-13-346-3
always \u9593\u65b7 13-2345-5-145-12456-5
always \u9593\u6b47 13-2345-5-15-346-3
always \u9593\u8adc 13-2345-5-145-346-2
always \u9593\u9694 13-2345-5-13-2346-2
always \u9593\u9699 13-2345-5-15-16-5
always \u95a3\u5b50 13-2346-2-125-156-1
always \u95b1\u5377 236-5-13-45-5
always \u95d5\u5931 245-236-3-24-156-3
always \u95d5\u5982 245-236-3-1245-34-2
always \u95d5\u6f0f 245-236-3-14-12356-5
always \u95d5\u7591 245-236-3-16-2
always \u963b\u5687 125-34-4-1235-2346-5
always \u963b\u585e 125-34-4-15-2346-5
always \u963f\u4fd7 2346-3-15-34-2
always \u963f\u8adb 2346-3-1256-2
always \u9644\u548c 12345-34-5-1235-2346-5
always \u9644\u8457 12345-34-5-1-25-2
always \u964d\u4f0f 15-46-2-12345-34-2
always \u964d\u5c07 15-46-2-13-46-5
always \u964d\u6575 15-46-2-145-16-2
always \u964d\u66f8 15-46-2-24-34-3
always \u964d\u670d 15-46-2-12345-34-2
always \u964d\u9f8d 15-46-2-14-12346-2
always \u9662\u5b50 45-5-125-156-1
always \u9662\u9577 45-5-1-1346-4
always \u9663\u5b50 1-136-5-125-156-1
always \u9678\u3001 14-234-5-6-0
always \u968a\u9577 145-1246-5-1-1346-4
always \u96a8\u8208 15-1246-2-15-13456-5
always \u96b1\u6c92 1456-4-134-126-5
always \u96c5\u6a02 23456-4-236-5
always \u96d9\u91cd 24-456-3-12-12346-2
always \u96e2\u9593 14-16-2-13-2345-5
always \u96e3\u5730 1345-1236-5-145-16-5
always \u96e3\u6c11 1345-1236-5-134-1456-2
always \u96e3\u80f8 1345-1236-5-15-235-3
always \u96ea\u8304 15-236-4-13-23456-3
always \u96fb\u710a 145-2345-5-1235-1236-5
always \u9732\u767d 14-12356-5-135-2456-2
always \u9732\u76f8 14-12356-5-15-46-5
always \u9732\u81c9 14-12356-5-14-2345-4
always \u9732\u9762 14-12356-5-134-2345-5
always \u9756\u96e3 13-13456-5-1345-1236-5
always \u975c\u8108 13-13456-5-134-2456-5
always \u975e\u5206 12345-356-3-12345-136-5
always \u975e\u96e3 12345-356-3-1345-1236-5
always \u9762\u5b50 134-2345-5-125-156-1
always \u9774\u5b50 15-236-3-125-156-1
always \u978b\u5b50 15-346-2-125-156-1
always \u978d\u5b50 1236-3-125-156-1
always \u97f3\u6a02 1456-3-236-5
always \u97ff\u61c9 15-46-4-13456-5
always \u9806\u61c9 24-123456-5-13456-5
always \u9818\u5b50 14-13456-4-125-156-1
always \u982d\u5b50 124-12356-2-125-156-1
always \u9838\u5b50 13-13456-4-125-156-1
always \u986f\u8457 15-2345-4-1-34-5
always \u98db\u6f32 12345-356-3-1-1346-5
always \u9903\u5b50 13-246-4-125-156-1
always \u990a\u5206 46-4-12345-136-5
always \u9918\u8208 1256-2-15-13456-5
always \u9928\u5b50 13-12456-4-125-156-1
always \u9928\u9577 13-12456-4-1-1346-4
always \u9996\u76f8 24-12356-4-15-46-5
always \u9996\u90fd 24-12356-4-145-34-3
always \u9996\u9577 24-12356-4-1-1346-4
always \u99ac\u5b50 134-345-4-125-156-1
always \u99ac\u864e 134-345-4-1235-34-3
always \u99ae\u6cb3 1234-13456-2-1235-2346-2
always \u9a0e\u5175 13-16-5-135-13456-3
always \u9a19\u5b50 1234-2345-5-125-156-1
always \u9a3e\u5b50 14-25-2-125-156-1
always \u9a4d\u9a0e 15-246-3-13-16-5
always \u9a55\u6a6b 13-246-3-1235-1356-5
always \u9aa8\u5b50 13-34-4-125-156-1
always \u9aa8\u76f8 13-34-4-15-46-5
always \u9ad4\u80d6 124-16-4-1234-1236-2
always \u9ad8\u66f4 13-146-3-13-1356-3
always \u9ad8\u8208 13-146-3-15-13456-5
always \u9ad8\u9e97 13-146-3-14-16-2
always \u9b06\u6563 15-12346-3-15-1236-4
always \u9b0d\u5b50 1235-34-2-125-156-1
always \u9b1a\u5b50 15-1256-3-125-156-1
always \u9b3c\u5b50 13-1246-4-125-156-1
always \u9bae\u5c11 15-2345-4-24-146-4
always \u9bae\u6065 15-2345-4-12-156-4
always \u9d28\u5b50 23456-3-125-156-1
always \u9d3b\u722a 1235-12346-2-1-146-4
always \u9d3f\u5b50 13-2346-3-125-156-1
always \u9d60\u7684 1235-34-2-145-16-5
always \u9ea5\u5b50 134-2456-5-125-156-1
always \u9ebb\u5b50 134-345-2-125-156-1
always \u9ec3\u51a0 1235-456-2-13-12456-3
always \u9ede\u5b50 145-2345-4-125-156-1
always \u9f13\u8b5f 13-34-4-125-146-5
always \u9f3b\u5b50 135-16-2-125-156-1
always \u9f9c\u8332 245-234-3-245-156-2
always \u9f9c\u88c2 13-256-3-14-346-5
